src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! # Verb inflection



LEXICON VTag
 V_ТУ ;
 V_ПОН ;

LEXICON V_ТУ
+V: V_ТУ-Prs ;
+V+Inf:%>ты K ;

LEXICON V_ПОН
+V: V_ПОН-Prs ;
+V+Inf:%>ты K ;

! ===========
!! ## PRESENT 
! ===========

LEXICON V_ТУ-Prs
!! Subject
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Sg:%>лд%>ам K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Sg:%>лд%>ан K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Sg:%>алд K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du:%>лд%>ман K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du:%>лд%>амн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du:%>лд%>тан K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du:%>лд%>атн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du:%>лд%>нган K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du:%>лд%>анган K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Pl:%>лд%>ув K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl:%>лд%>ты K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl:%>лд%>аты K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl:%>лд%>ат K ; !
!! Object Singular
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Sg+OcSg3:%>эм K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Sg+OcSg3:%>эн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Sg+OcSg3:%>элд K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du+OcSg3:%>эмн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du+OcSg3:%>алдн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du+OcSg3:%>лдан K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du+OcSg3:%>лдан K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du+OcSg3:%>алдн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Pl+OcSg3:%>лдув K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl+OcSg3:%>лдан K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl+OcSg3:%>алдн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl+OcSg3:%>элд K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl+OcSg3:%>лдалд K ; !
!! Object Plural
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Sg+OcPl3:%>алдам K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Sg+OcPl3:%>лдам K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Sg+OcPl3:%>алдан K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Sg+OcPl3:%>лдан K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Sg+OcPl3:%>алд K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du+OcPl3:%>алдамн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du+OcPl3:%>лдамн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du+OcPl3:%>алдн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du+OcPl3:%>лдан K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du+OcPl3:%>алдн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du+OcPl3:%>лдан K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Pl+OcPl3:%>алдув K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Pl+OcPl3:%>лдув K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl+OcPl3:%>алдн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl+OcPl3:%>лдан K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl+OcPl3:%>алдалд K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl+OcPl3:%>лдалд K ; !
!!Passive
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc1Sg:%>ыюм K ; !
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc2Sg:%>ыйн K ; !
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc3Sg:%>ы K ; !
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du:%>ыйман K ; !
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du:%>ыйтан K ; !
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du:%>ыйнган K ; !
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc1Pl:%>ыюв K ; 
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl:%>ыйты K ; !
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl:%>ыят K ; !

LEXICON V_ПОН-Prs
!! Subject
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Sg:%>лд%>ум K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Sg:%>лд%>ан K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Sg:%>алд K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du:%>лд%>амн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du:%>лд%>атн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du:%>лд%>анган K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Pl:%>лд%>ув K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl:%>лд%>аты K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl:%>лд%>ат K ; !
!! ### Singular Object
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Sg+OcSg3:%>эм K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Sg+OcSg3:%>эн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Sg+OcSg3:%>элд K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du+OcSg3:%>эмн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du+OcSg3:%>алдн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du+Oc3:%>алдн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Pl+Oc3:%>лдув K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl+Oc3:%>алдн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl+Oc3:%>элд K ; !
!! ### Dual and Plural Object
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Sg+OcPl3:%>алдам K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Sg+OcPl3:%>алдан K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Sg+OcPl3:%>алд K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du+OcPl3:%>алдамн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du+OcPl3:%>алдн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du+OcPl3:%>алдн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Pl+OcPl3:%>алдув K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl+OcPl3:%>алдн K ; !
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl+OcPl3:%>алдалд K ; !
!! Passive
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc1Sg:%>аюм K ; !
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc2Sg:%>айн K ; !
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc3Sg:%>а K ; !
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du:%>айман K ; !
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du:%>айтан K ; !
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du:%>айнган K ; !
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc1Pl:%>аюв K ; 
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl:%>айты K ; !
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl:%>аят K ; !


!! -лд-эм Ӆлд


!
!! PRETERITE 
!




!
!! IMPERATIVE 
!



!
!! CONDITIONAL PRESENT
!




!
!! REFLEXIVE 
!

!! PRESENT 



!! IMPERFECT 



!
!! CONDITIONAL PRESENT 
!




!

!LEXICON V_ПОН-Stem



!
!! IMPERATIVE 
!




!
!! CONDITIONAL 
!



!
!! REFLEXIVE 
!





!! INFINITIVE 

!! -ty -infinitive added

+Der/ты+Inf:ты K ;
+Der/ты+Inf+Lat:тыя K ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
