src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs

акӑтты+V:акӑт V_ПОН  "kerätä" ;
понты+V:пон V_ПОН  "" ;
инщасты+V:анщас V_ПОН  "kysyä" ;
туты+V:ту V_ТУ  "viedä" ;
